hu: Siklóernyő futómű konfigurációja: Fix egykerekes + csúszótalp; Fix egykerekes + farokkerék; Behúzható egykerekes + csúszótalp; Behúzható egykerekes + farokkerék; Csak csúszótalpas; Tricikli elrendezésű futómű; Egyéb
sl-SI: Konfiguracija pristajalnega podvozja jadralnega letala: Fiksno enojno kolo in drsnica; Fiksno enojno kolo in repno kolo; Uvlačljivo enojno kolo in drsnica; Uvlačljivo enojno kolo in repno kolo; Samo drsnice; Tricikelsko pristajalno podvozje; Drugo
nb: Konfigurasjon av landingsunderstell for glidefly: Fast monohjul og meie; Fast monohjul og halehjul; Inntrekkbart monohjul og meie; Inntrekkbart monohjul og halehjul; Kun meier; Trehjulet understell; Annet
fi: Purjelentokoneen laskutelineiden kokoonpano: Kiinteä yksipyöräteline + liukujalas; Kiinteä yksipyöräteline + kannuspyörä; Sisäänvedettävä yksipyöräteline + liukujalas; Sisäänvedettävä yksipyöräteline + kannuspyörä; Vain liukujalakset; Kolmipyöräteline; Muu
th: การจัดวางระบบฐานล้อของเครื่องร่อน: ล้อเดี่ยวแบบคงที่ + ฐานสกี; ล้อเดี่ยวแบบคงที่ + ล้อหาง; ล้อเดี่ยวพับเก็บได้ + ฐานสกี; ล้อเดี่ยวพับเก็บได้ + ล้อหาง; ฐานสกีเท่านั้น; ฐานล้อแบบสามล้อ; อื่นๆ
ru: Конфигурация шасси планера: Неубирающееся моноколесо + лыжа; Неубирающееся моноколесо + хвостовое колесо; Убирающееся моноколесо + лыжа; Убирающееся моноколесо + хвостовое колесо; Только лыжи; Трехстоечное шасси; Другое
pt-BR: Configuração do trem de pouso do parapente: Monoroda fixa + esqui; Monoroda fixa + roda de cauda; Monoroda retrátil + esqui; Monoroda retrátil + roda de cauda; Apenas esquis; Trem de pouso triciclo; Outra
cs: Konfigurace podvozku kluzáku: Pevné monokolo a lyžina; Pevné monokolo a ostruhové kolo; Zatahovací monokolo a lyžina; Zatahovací monokolo a ostruhové kolo; Pouze lyžiny; Tříkolový podvozek; Ostatní
tr: Planör iniş takımı yapılandırması: Sabit tek tekerlek ve kızak; Sabit tek tekerlek ve kuyruk tekerleği; Katlanabilir tek tekerlek ve kızak; Katlanabilir tek tekerlek ve kuyruk tekerleği; Yalnızca kızak; Üç tekerlekli iniş takımı; Diğer
da: Svæveflyets landingsudstyrskonfiguration: Fast monohjul + mede; Fast monohjul + halehjul; Optrækkeligt monohjul + mede; Optrækkeligt monohjul + halehjul; Kun meder; Trehjulet landingsstel; Andet
bg-BG: Конфигурация на колесника на безмоторен самолет: Фиксирано единично колело + плъзгач; Фиксирано единично колело + опашно колело; Прибиращо се единично колело + плъзгач; Прибиращо се единично колело + опашно колело; Само плъзгачи; Триколесен колесник; Друго
zh-CN: 滑翔机起落架配置: 固定单轮 + 滑橇; 固定单轮 + 尾轮; 可收放单轮 + 滑橇; 可收放单轮 + 尾轮; 仅滑橇; 前三点式起落架; 其他
ja: グライダー着陸装置の構成: 固定式単車輪 + スキッド; 固定式単車輪 + 尾輪; 引き込み式単車輪 + スキッド; 引き込み式単車輪 + 尾輪; スキッドのみ; 三輪式降着装置; その他
el: Διαμόρφωση συστήματος προσγείωσης ανεμοπτέρου: Σταθερός μονός τροχός + πέδιλο; Σταθερός μονός τροχός + ουραίος τροχός; Ανασυρόμενος μονός τροχός + πέδιλο; Ανασυρόμενος μονός τροχός + ουραίος τροχός; Μόνο πέδιλα; Τρίκυκλο σύστημα προσγείωσης; Άλλο
es: Configuración del tren de aterrizaje del planeador: Monorrueda fija y patín; Monorrueda fija y rueda de cola; Monorrueda retráctil y patín; Monorrueda retráctil y rueda de cola; Solo patines; Tren de aterrizaje triciclo; Otra
ro-RO: Configurația trenului de aterizare al planorului: Monoroată fixă + bechie; Monoroată fixă + roată de coadă; Monoroată retractabilă + bechie; Monoroată retractabilă + roată de coadă; Doar bechii; Tren de aterizare triciclu; Altele
ko: 글라이더 착륙 장치 구성: 고정식 모노휠 + 스키드; 고정식 모노휠 + 테일휠; 접이식 모노휠 + 스키드; 접이식 모노휠 + 테일휠; 스키드 전용; 트라이사이클 랜딩 기어; 기타
it: Configurazione del carrello di atterraggio dell'aliante: Monoruota fissa + pattino; Monoruota fissa + ruotino di coda; Monoruota retrattile + pattino; Monoruota retrattile + ruotino di coda; Solo pattini; Carrello di atterraggio a triciclo; Altro
pt-PT: Configuração do trem de aterragem do planador: Roda única fixa + patim; Roda única fixa + roda de cauda; Roda única retrátil + patim; Roda única retrátil + roda de cauda; Apenas patins; Trem de aterragem triciclo; Outra
en: Glider landing gear configuration: Fixed monowheel + skid; Fixed monowheel + tailwheel; Retractable monowheel + skid; Retractable monowheel + tailwheel; Skids only; Tricycle landing gear; Other
nl: Zweefvliegtuig landingsgestelconfiguratie: Vast monowiel + glijder; Vast monowiel + staartwiel; Intrekbaar monowiel + glijder; Intrekbaar monowiel + staartwiel; Alleen glijders; Driewielig landingsgestel; Overig
zh-TW: 滑翔機起落架配置: 固定式單輪 + 滑橇; 固定式單輪 + 尾輪; 可收放單輪 + 滑橇; 可收放單輪 + 尾輪; 僅滑橇; 前三點式起落架; 其他
lt-LT: Sklandytuvo važiuoklės konfigūracija: Fiksuotas vienas ratas + pavaža; Fiksuotas vienas ratas + galinis ratas; Įtraukiamas vienas ratas + pavaža; Įtraukiamas vienas ratas + galinis ratas; Tik pavažos; Trijų ratų važiuoklė; Kita
de: Fahrwerkskonfiguration des Segelflugzeugs: Festes Einrad + Kufe; Festes Einrad + Spornrad; Einziehbares Einrad + Kufe; Einziehbares Einrad + Spornrad; Nur Kufen; Dreibeinfahrwerk; Sonstige
hr-HR: Konfiguracija stajnog trapa jedrilice: Fiksni jedan kotač + skija; Fiksni jedan kotač + repni kotač; Uvlačivi jedan kotač + skija; Uvlačivi jedan kotač + repni kotač; Samo skije; Stajni trap u tri točke (tricikl); Ostalo
fr: Configuration du train d’atterrissage du planeur: Monoroue fixe + patin; Monoroue fixe + roulette de queue; Monoroue escamotable + patin; Monoroue escamotable + roulette de queue; Patins uniquement; Train d’atterrissage tricycle; Autre
pl: Konfiguracja podwozia szybowca: Stałe koło pojedyncze + płoza; Stałe koło pojedyncze + kółko ogonowe; Chowane koło pojedyncze + płoza; Chowane koło pojedyncze + kółko ogonowe; Tylko płozy; Trójkołowe podwozie; Inna
vi: Cấu hình càng hạ cánh của tàu lượn: Bánh đơn cố định + guốc trượt; Bánh đơn cố định + bánh đuôi; Bánh đơn thu vào + guốc trượt; Bánh đơn thu vào + bánh đuôi; Chỉ guốc trượt; Bánh đáp 3 cụm; Khác
sk-SK: Konfigurácia podvozku vetroňa: Pevné jedno koleso + lyžina; Pevné jedno koleso + ostruhové koleso; Zaťahovacie jedno koleso + lyžina; Zaťahovacie jedno koleso + ostruhové koleso; Iba lyžiny; Trojkolesový podvozok; Iné
sv: Konfiguration av landningsställ för glidflygplan: Fast monohjul + med; Fast monohjul + sporrhjul; Infällbart monohjul + med; Infällbart monohjul + sporrhjul; Endast medar; Trehjuligt landställ; Övrigt